en_ia_morphology_template.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
    ! Noun tags
    +N      ! Noun tag
    +Sg     ! Singular
    +Pl     ! Plural
    +Poss   ! Possessive form
    
    ! Verb tags
    +V      ! Verb tag
    +Inf    ! Infinitive
    +Pres3Sg ! 3rd person singular present
    +Past   ! Past tense
    +Prog   ! Progressive/gerund

LEXICON Root
    Nouns ;  ! Noun entries
    Verbs ;  ! Verb entries

! ========== NOUNS ==========
LEXICON Nouns
    cat     N ;
    dog     N ;
    church  N_s ;
    kiss    N_s ;
    beauty:beaut N_y ;
    sky:sk  N_y ;

LEXICON N
    +N:0    Num ;

LEXICON Num
    +Sg:0   PossWithS ;
    +Pl:s   PossWithoutS ;

LEXICON N_s
    +N:0    Num_s ;

LEXICON Num_s
    +Sg:0   PossWithS ;
    +Pl:es  PossWithoutS ;

LEXICON N_y
    +N:0    Num_y ;

LEXICON Num_y
    +Sg:y   PossWithS ;
    +Pl:ies PossWithoutS ;

LEXICON PossWithS
    +Poss:'s    # ;
    # ;  ! No ending

LEXICON PossWithoutS
    +Poss:'     # ;
    # ;  ! No ending

! ========== VERBS ==========
LEXICON Verbs
    jump    V ;     ! Regular verb (add -s, -ed, -ing)
    live    V_e ;   ! Ends with silent -e (drop -e before -ing)
    wash    V_s ;   ! Ends with sibilant (add -es for 3rd person)
    try     V_y ;   ! Ends with -y (change to -ies for 3rd person)

! Regular verbs (e.g., "jump")
LEXICON V
    +V:0    Tense ;

! Verbs ending in silent -e (e.g., "live")
LEXICON V_e
    +V:0    Tense_e ;

! Verbs ending in sibilant (e.g., "wash")
LEXICON V_s
    +V:0    Tense_s ;

! Verbs ending in -y (e.g., "try")
LEXICON V_y
    +V:0    Tense_y ;

! Tense inflection for regular verbs
LEXICON Tense
    +Inf:0      # ;    ! jump
    +Pres3Sg:s  # ;    ! jumps
    +Past:ed    # ;    ! jumped
    +Prog:ing   # ;    ! jumping

! Tense inflection for silent -e verbs
LEXICON Tense_e
    +Inf:0      # ;    ! live
    +Pres3Sg:s  # ;    ! lives
    +Past:ed    # ;    ! lived
    +Prog:ing   # ;    ! living (drop -e)

! Tense inflection for sibilant-ending verbs
LEXICON Tense_s
    +Inf:0      # ;    ! wash
    +Pres3Sg:es # ;    ! washes
    +Past:ed    # ;    ! washed
    +Prog:ing   # ;    ! washing

! Tense inflection for -y ending verbs
LEXICON Tense_y
    +Inf:0      # ;    ! try
    +Pres3Sg:ies # ;   ! tries
    +Past:ed    # ;    ! tried
    +Prog:ing   # ;    ! trying

END
